District of Columbia statutes.
3-1712

Repealed

Quarters for Board; compensation of Board members; appointment and compensation of clerks, inspectors, and other personnel; payment of expenses of Board

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 38(a), 40 DCR 660
1981 Ed., § 2-401 to 2-419.